Maine, session 132, LD654.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 14 MRSA §7482, first ¶, as amended by PL 2009, c. 428, §1, is further
amended to read:
Notwithstanding the total amount of a debt or contract, a "small claim" means a right
of action cognizable by a court if the debt or damage does not exceed $6,000 $10,000
exclusive of interest and costs. It does not include an action involving the title to real estate.
Sec. 2. Effective date. This Act takes effect January 1, 2026.
Page 1 - 132LR0948(03)